Utah statutes.
63G-14-102.   Definitions.

(1)  "Department" means the Department of Public Safety created in Section 53-1-103.

(2) (a)  "Foreign national," except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), means an individual who is a citizen of a foreign country.

(b)  "Foreign national" does not include an individual who is in the United States, but who is not lawfully present in any of the states of the United States.

(3)  "Permit" means an identification permit issued in accordance with Section 63G-14-204.

(4)  "Program" means the Utah Pilot Sponsored Resident Immigrant Program created in Section 63G-14-201.

(5)  "Resident immigrant" means an individual who:

(a)  is a foreign national; and

(b)  is accepted into the program in accordance with Section 63G-14-202.

(6)  "Sponsor" means an individual who agrees to sponsor a foreign national under the program in accordance with Section 63G-14-203.



Enacted by Chapter 20, 2011 General Session

